Hawaii statutes.
[§468E-10] Examination for license.
(a) Each applicant for licensure under this chapter shall take a written
examination in accordance with procedures prescribed by the board. Standards
for acceptable performance shall be established by the board.

(b) Applicants for licensure shall be examined
at a time and place and under such supervision as the board may determine.

(c) The board may examine in whatever
theoretical or applied fields of speech pathology or audiology it considers
appropriate and may examine with regard to a person's professional skills and
judgment in the utilization of speech pathology or audiology techniques and
methods.

(d) The board shall maintain a permanent
record of all examination scores. [L 1974, c 48, pt of §1]

Cross References

Disposal of examination records, see §94-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next